Alabama, session 2026rs, HB607.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. For the period commencing on May 1, 2026,
and ending on September 30, 2031, Jackson Hospital & Clinic,
Inc. and JHC Pharmacy, LLC, are exempt from paying all state,
county, and municipal fees and taxes.
Section 2. This act shall become effective immediately.
Page 1